District of Columbia statutes.
7-904

Limited liability of persons making reports.

Any person who in good faith makes a report pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to any regulation promulgated under the authority of this chapter, shall not, by reason thereof, be personally liable in damages.

Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 633, Pub. L. 90-458, § 4
1981 Ed., § 6-1604.
1973 Ed., § 6-1404.